Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-910
State assents to Intermodal Surface Transportation Efficiency Act; Game and Parks Commission; powers.

The State of Nebraska hereby assents to the provisions of section 1302 of the Intermodal Surface Transportation Efficiency Act cited as the Symms National Recreational Trails Act of 1991 and establishing the National Recreational Trails Funding Program, Public Law 102-240, 102nd Congress. The Game and Parks Commission is authorized, empowered, and directed to perform all acts necessary on behalf of the State of Nebraska to the conduct and establishment of recreational trails and trail-related projects in accordance with such act of Congress for and within the State of Nebraska. The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to assist in carrying out the purposes of this section. No funds accruing to the State of Nebraska pursuant to the act shall be used in violation of the act.

Laws 1993, LB 235, § 51;

Laws 1996, LB 296, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 81-815.55;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 371.